test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-roka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - roka: # Noun 'eng hand, arm/fin käsi' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/roka/ declension_4
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: roka
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: rokas
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: rokai
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: roku
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: rokā
     roka+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: roka
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: rokas
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: roku
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: rokām
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: rokas
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: rokās
     roka+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: rokas
